California statutes. Insurance Code
The commissioner may suspend or revoke the permission granted any insurer in Section 10205.5 if, after notice and hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, he finds that the insurer has:

(a) Misrepresented the conditional nature of the coverage;

(b) Neglected or refused either to cancel or otherwise terminate such coverage within the time required by such section;

(c) Delivered any such memorandum which did not comply with
 subsection (a) (2) of Section 10205.5;

(d) Shown a lack of diligence in making revisions in the policy necessary to obtain its approval by the commissioner;

(e) Failed so often in so many important respects in drafting any such policy to conform to the applicable requirements of the Insurance Code that a conclusion of lack of good faith or competency in drafting is reasonably justified;

(f) Circulated announcements of coverage to individuals insured which failed to advise them of the conditional nature of the coverage; or

(g) In any other manner so negligently or carelessly handled the effecting of insurance under Section 10205.5 or the administration thereof that the policyholder or the persons insured have been misled or exposed to the danger of
 loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

(a) The policy shall provide that the validity of the policy shall not be contested, except for nonpayment of premiums, after it has been in force for two years from its date of issue; and that no statement made by any employee insured under the policy relating to his or her insurability shall be used in contesting the validity of the insurance with respect to which the statement was made after the insurance has been in force prior to the contest for a period of two years during the employee’s lifetime nor unless it is contained in a written
 application signed by the employee.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if photographic identification is presented during the application or enrollment process, and if an impostor is substituted for a named insured in any part of the application or enrollment process, with or without the knowledge of the named insured, then no contract between the insurer and the named insured is formed, and any purported insurance contract is void from its inception.

(2) As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Application or enrollment process” means any or all of the steps required of a named insured in applying for a certificate under a group policy of life insurance, including, but not limited to, executing any part of the application or enrollment form, submitting to medical or physical examination or
 testing, or providing a sample or specimen of blood, urine, or other bodily substance.

(B) “Impostor” means a person other than the named insured who participates in any manner in the application or enrollment process for a certificate under a group life insurance policy and represents himself or herself to be the named insured or represents that a sample or specimen of blood, urine, or other bodily substance is that of the named insured.

(C) “Named insured” means the individual named in an application or enrollment form for a certificate under a group life insurance policy as the person whose life is to be insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 184, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.5.

The policy may provide that the insurer is not liable, or is liable only in a reduced amount, for losses arising from conditions:

(a) Relating to war or act of war;

(b) Relating to military or naval service;

(c) Relating to aviation.

The commissioner may after notice and hearing prescribe reasonable rules and regulations relative to the use of provisions permitted by this section in respect to policies outstanding or hereafter
 issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.

The policy shall contain a provision that:

(a) The policy, the application of the employer and the individual applications, if any, of the employees constitute the entire contract of insurance.

(b) All statements made by the employer or by the individual employees are, in the absence of fraud, representations and not warranties.

(c) Such statements will not be used in defense to a claim under the policy, unless contained in a written application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.

The policy shall contain a provision for the equitable adjustment of the premium or the amount of insurance payable in the event of a misstatement of the age of an employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

(a) Except as provided by Sections 10203.5 and 10203.8, the policy shall contain a provision that the insurer will issue to the employer for delivery to the insured employee an individual certificate setting forth:

(1) A statement as to the insurance protection to which the employee is entitled and to whom payable.

(2) A provision that if the employment terminates for any reason whatsoever and the employee applies
 to the insurer within 31 days after the termination, paying the premium applicable to the class of risk to which he or she belongs and to the form and amount of the policy at his or her then attained age, he or she is entitled, without producing evidence of insurability, to the issue by the insurer of any individual life policy in any one of the forms, other than term insurance, customarily issued by the insurer.

(3) A statement that the policy in lieu of group insurance will be in an amount equal to the amount of his or her protection under the group insurance at the time of the termination.

(4) A provision that if the employee dies during the 31-day period within which he or she is entitled to have an individual policy issued to him or her in accordance with this section and before the policy shall have become effective, the amount of life insurance that the employee is entitled
 to have issued to him or her under the individual policy shall be payable as a claim under the group policy, whether or not application for the individual policy or the payment of the first premium therefor has been made.

(b) If any employee insured under a group life insurance policy delivered in this state becomes entitled under the terms of the policy to have an individual policy of life insurance issued to him or her without evidence of insurability, subject to making of application and payment of the first premium within the period specified in the policy, and if the employee is not given notice of the existence of the right at least 15 days prior to the expiration date of the period, the employee shall have an additional period within which to exercise the right, but nothing in this section shall be construed to continue any insurance beyond the period provided in the policy. This additional period shall expire 25 days next after the
 employee is given the notice but in no event shall the additional period extend beyond 60 days next after the expiration date of the period provided in the policy. Written notice presented to the employee or mailed by the policyholder to the last-known address of the employee or mailed by the insurer to the last-known address of the employee as furnished by the policyholder shall constitute notice for the purpose of this section.

(c) Paragraphs (2) and (4) of subdivision (a), and subdivision (b), shall apply to any insurance issued pursuant to Section 10203.4 on the life of a spouse of an employee.

(d) The contract of insurance and individual certificate may contain provisions defining the extent to which the employer acts as the agent of the employee or may act as the agent of the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 469.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.1.

An individual certificate shall be individualized, except that in the case of an individual certificate issued under a group policy which requires no regular contribution toward the payment of the premium to be made by the employees covered thereunder, such individual certificate need not be individualized if it is in a form setting forth a clear statement of the conditions of eligibility from which the employee can determine the circumstances under which he is insured under the master policy.

An individual certificate shall be deemed to be “individualized,” within the meaning of this section, if it contains either the name of the
 employee covered or some other means of identifying to the employee covered that it is his individual certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.3.

(a) Subject to the terms of the policy, or pursuant to an agreement between the insured, the group policyholder, and the insurer, any person insured under a group life insurance policy may make to any person, other than the policyholder, an assignment of all or any part of the incidents of ownership conferred on him or her by the policy or by law, including specifically, but not by way of limitation, the right to exercise the conversion privilege and the right to name a beneficiary.

The enactment of
 this section made at the 1969 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who has been diagnosed with a terminal illness shall have the right to make an absolute assignment for value of his or her interest in a policy or certificate of life insurance.

(c) The right of assignment in subdivision (b) shall not extend to situations in which the benefits of the policy or certificate of life insurance are used as collateral for a loan.

(d) The viatical broker shall notify the spouse of a terminally ill viator of the viatication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 440, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.

The policy shall contain a provision that to the groups or classes originally insured there will be added from time to time all new employees of the employer eligible for insurance in such groups or classes, except that the policy may provide that if the premium is paid by the employer and employees jointly any employee who fails to request insurance during the period of eligibility following his employment as prescribed by the policy shall not be insured until he has furnished evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.5.

Whenever any provision of this chapter requires the payment of a premium by any person, such requirement relates to the responsibility for the payment of the premium and not to the transmission or collection of the premium or premium contributions. Such transmission or collection shall be performed by the policyholder, except where the policy specifies the persons other than the policyholder by whom such transmission or collection shall be made, and in one of the following situations:

(a) If such policy covers the employees of more than one employer, the insurer may collect premium contributions from individual
 employers whose employees are insured or may assist the policyholder in making such collections. If the employees of more than 100 such employers are covered under such policy, it shall state as a separate part of the premium to be charged for the policy the amount to be charged by the insurer for such collection.

(b) If the policy covers a group of governmental employees and the governmental unit paying such employees will not transmit their premium contribution after pay roll deduction, the insurer may collect from the individual employees. If more than 100 such employees are covered under such policy, it shall state as a separate part of the premium to be charged for the policy the amount to be charged by the insurer for such collection.

(c) If individual members of the group make payment of their share of the premium contribution to the insurer without billing or solicitation
 by the insurer during a period of temporary absence from active work of not exceeding 90 days, such payment may be received without the necessity of any separately stated charge by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

10211.

Policies of group life insurance may conform to the following conditions, any other provisions of this chapter notwithstanding:

(a) When issued in this State by any foreign insurer, they may contain any provision required by the law of the State under which the insurer is organized.

(b) When issued in other States or countries by domestic insurers, they may contain any provision required by the laws of the State, or country, in which they are issued.

(c) They may contain provisions on
 any of the requirements set forth in sections 10205 to 10210, which, in the opinion of the commissioner, are more favorable to the employer or to the employee than the required provisions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10212.

Except as provided in this chapter, in every group policy issued by a domestic life insurer, the employer is the policyholder for all purposes within the meaning of this code. If entitled to vote at meetings of the insurer, he shall be entitled to one vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.

If hereafter any dividend is paid or any premium refunded under any policy of group life insurance heretofore or hereafter issued, the excess, if any, of the aggregate dividends or premium refunds under such policy over the aggregate expenditures for insurance under such policy made from funds contributed by the policyholder, or by an employer of insured persons or by union or association to which such insured persons belong, including expenditures made in connection with the administration of such policy, shall be applied by the policyholder for the benefit of such insured employees generally or their dependents or insured members generally or their dependents. For the purpose
 of this section and at the option of the policyholder, “policy” may include all group life and disability insurance policies of the policyholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1746.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Blanket Life Insurance [10220. - 10225.]

10220.

Any life insurer may issue policies of blanket life insurance for a term not exceeding one year with premium rates less than the usual rates for such insurance. Such policies may thereafter be renewed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------

10221.

The only forms of blanket life insurance are those set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------

10222.

Life insurance conforming to all the following conditions is one form of blanket life insurance:

(a) Written under a policy issued to a newspaper, farm paper, magazine, or other periodical publication;

(b) Insuring independent contractors, such as newspaperboys, dealers, distributors, wholesalers, or other personnel, engaged in the sale, distribution, collecting for, or other activities pertaining to the marketing and delivery of publications referred to in subdivision (a), including attending coaching school or while participating in a trip organized, supervised, and sponsored as a reward for meritorious service, for amounts of insurance based upon a plan precluding individual selection;

(c) For the benefit of persons other than the policyholder;

(d) Where the premium is remitted by the policyholder;

(e) Insuring persons without any requirement for individual enrollment and without individual commitment or undertaking to pay, and with either the policyholder or the insured to pay all the premium or part of the premium as a condition precedent to coverage.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the cost of the insurance coverage being borne by the individuals insured or by their parents or guardians. When the premium for the insurance is paid by the person insured, he may, upon request, obtain from the insurer in certificate form a copy of the policy. 

Coverage shall not be provided to any person who files with the entity to whom the blanket policy is to be issued, for delivery to the insurer, a written statement requesting that he not be covered. In the case of a minor, such statement may be filed by his parent or guardian. If the number of persons filing such statements exceeds ten percent (10%) of the number of persons within categories defined as covered under the policy, it shall not be put into effect, and if in effect shall not be renewed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------

10223.

A blanket life insurance policy may provide that the insurer is not liable, or is liable only in a reduced amount, for losses arising from conditions:

(a) Relating to war or acts of war;

(b) Relating to military or naval service;

(c) Relating to aviation.

After notice and hearing the commissioner may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations relative to the use of provisions permitted by this section in respect to policies outstanding or hereafter issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------

10224.

Policies of blanket life insurance may conform to the following conditions, any other provisions of this chapter notwithstanding:

(a) When issued in this State by any foreign insurer, such policies may contain any provision required by the law of the state under which the insurer is organized.

(b) When issued in other states or countries by domestic insurers, such policies may contain any provision required by the laws of the state, or country, in which they are issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------

10225.

A policy of blanket insurance shall not be delivered or issued for delivery in this State until a copy of the form of the policy is filed with and approved by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Long-Term Care Insurance [10231. - 10237.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10231. - 10231.8.]

10231.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1342, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.2.

“Long-term care insurance” includes any insurance policy, certificate, or rider advertised, marketed, offered, solicited, or designed to provide coverage for diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance, or personal care services that are provided in a setting other than an acute care unit of a hospital. Long-term care insurance includes all products containing any of the following benefit types: coverage for institutional care including care in a nursing home, convalescent facility, extended care facility, custodial care facility, skilled nursing facility, or personal care home; home care coverage including home health care, personal care, homemaker services, hospice, or respite care; or community-based coverage including adult day care, hospice, or respite care. Long-term care insurance includes disability based long-term care policies but does not include insurance designed primarily to provide Medicare supplement or major medical expense coverage.

Long-term care policies, certificates, and riders shall be regulated under this chapter. The commissioner shall review and approve individual and group policies, certificates, riders, and outlines of coverage. Other applicable laws and regulations shall also apply to long-term care insurance insofar as they do not conflict with the provisions in this chapter. Long-term care benefits designed to provide coverage of 12 months or more that are contained in or amended to Medicare supplement or other disability policies and certificates shall be regulated under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.3.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) An “alternate plan of care” means a plan of care that includes a specification of long-term care services, providers, or places of care that are not specifically defined as covered services, providers, or places of care under the policy. The alternate plan of care shall be developed by a licensed health care practitioner, describe the insured’s needs, and specify the type, frequency, and providers of all formal and informal long-term care services that are required by the insured and the cost, if any. The services, providers, and places of care specified in an alternate plan of care shall include those that are specifically defined as covered services, providers, and places under the
 policy, as well as those that are not specifically defined as covered services, providers, and places under the policy.

(2) An “alternate-plan-of-care provision” means a provision in a policy, rider, endorsement, or amendment that allows benefits for services, providers, and places of care that are specified in an alternate plan of care.

(3) “Licensed health care practitioner” means a physician, registered nurse, licensed social worker, or other individual whom the United States Secretary of the Treasury may prescribe by regulation.

(4) “Plan of care” means a written description of the insured’s needs and a specification of the type, frequency, and providers of all formal and informal long-term care services required by the insured and the cost, if any.

(b) An alternate-plan-of-care provision shall provide for all of the following:

(1) An alternate plan of care may be proposed by the insured or the insurer. Adoption, amendment, or replacement of an alternate plan of care shall be agreed to by the insured, the insurer, and a licensed health care practitioner that is independent of the insurer. Consent or agreement to an alternate plan of care shall be free and mutual.

(2) The maximum benefit available under the contract shall not change based on an insured utilizing an alternate plan of care, but that benefit will be reduced by the amount of any benefits paid under an alternate plan of care.

(3) Policy benefits are payable for all services, providers, and places of care that are specified in an alternate plan of care. Coverage for services, providers,
 and places of care under an alternate plan of care shall be in addition to, not in lieu of, coverage for services, providers, and places of care that are specifically defined as covered services under the policy.

(4) If adopted, an alternate plan of care replaces any existing plan of care, including any previously adopted alternate plan of care. No benefits are payable for services provided pursuant to a plan of care after it is replaced by an alternate plan of care.

(5) An alternate plan of care can be replaced by a new plan of care at any time.

(A) If the new plan of care is not an alternate plan of care, the new plan of care does not need to be adopted in the manner described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(B) If the new plan of care is a new
 or amended alternate plan of care, the new or amended alternate plan of care shall be adopted in the manner described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(C) No benefits are payable for services provided pursuant to an alternate plan of care after it is replaced by a new plan of care.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an insurer to include a provision authorizing an alternate plan of care. However, an insurer and an insured may agree to use an alternate plan of care even if there is no provision in the policy that specifically authorizes one. Nothing in this section is intended to obligate either party to negotiate an alternate plan of care. If an insurer does not accept an extra-contractual request for an alternate plan of care, the rejection is not a denial of a claim.

(d) This section
 shall apply to policies issued on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (AB 2180)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.4.

“Applicant” means either of the following:

(a) In the case of an individual long-term care insurance policy, the person who seeks to contract for benefits.

(b) In the case of a group long-term care insurance policy, the proposed certificate holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1342, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.5.

“Certificate” means any certificate issued under a group long-term care insurance policy, which policy has been delivered or issued for delivery in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1342, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.6.

“Group long-term care insurance” means a long-term care insurance policy which is delivered or issued for delivery in this state and issued to any of the following:

(a) One or more employers or labor organizations, or a trust or to the trustees of a fund established by one or more employers or labor organizations, or a combination thereof, for employees or former employees or a combination thereof or for members or former members or a combination thereof, of the labor organization.

(b) Any professional, trade, or occupational association for its members or former or retired members, or combination thereof, if that association meets both of the following:

(1) Is composed of individuals all of whom are or were actively engaged in the same profession, trade, or occupation.

(2) Has been maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance.

(c) An association or a trust or the trustees of a fund established, created, or maintained for the benefit of members of one or more associations. Prior to advertising, marketing, or offering that policy or a certificate within this state, the association or associations, or the insurer of the association or associations, shall file evidence with the commissioner that the association or associations have at the outset a minimum of 100 persons and have been organized and maintained in good faith for a primary purpose other than that of obtaining insurance, have been in active existence for at least one year, have a constitution and bylaws which provide all of the following, and provide evidence that the following have been consistently implemented:

(1) The association or associations hold regular meetings, not less than annually, to further purposes of the members.

(2) Except for credit unions, the association or associations collect dues or solicit contributions from members.

(3) The members have voting privileges and representation on the governing board and committees.

Thirty days after that filing the association or associations shall be deemed to satisfy these organizational requirements, unless the commissioner makes a finding that the association or associations do not satisfy those organizational requirements.

(d) A group other than as described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), subject to all of the following findings by the commissioner:

(1) The issuance of the group policy or certificate is not contrary to the best interest of the public.

(2) The issuance of the group policy will result in economies of acquisition or administration.

(3) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums charged.

(4) The use of the true or fictitious name of the group, group master policyholder, group policy, certificate, or any trust or other entity created or used for the marketing of the group policy or certificates is not deceptive or misleading with regard to the status, character, or proprietary or representative capacity of the insurer, group, trust, or other entity.

(5) The group’s main revenue source is not related to the marketing of insurance.

(6) The group’s outreach method to obtain new members is not related to the solicitation of insurance.

(7) The group provides benefits or services, other than insurance, of significant value to its members. The commissioner shall investigate the percentage of members using the other services and the monetary value of those services.

(e) A life care contract provider which has received a certificate of authority in accordance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1770) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. Any life care contract provider which has not received the certificate of authority from the State Department of Social Services shall be subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.8.

“Policy” means any policy, contract, subscriber agreement, rider or endorsement delivered or issued for delivery in this state by an insurer, fraternal benefit society, nonprofit hospital service plan, or any similar organization, regulated by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1342, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [10232. - 10233.8.]

10232.

(a) No group long-term care insurance coverage may be offered or sold to a resident of this state under a group policy issued in another state to a group described in subdivision (d) of Section 10231.6, unless the commissioner has determined that the requirements imposed by subdivision (d) of Section 10231.6 have been met. At least 30 days in advance of advertising, marketing, or offering coverage within this state, an insurer issuing a policy to a group described in subdivision (d) of Section 10231.6 shall accomplish an informational filing
 with the commissioner which consists of the following materials:

(1) A specimen master policy and certificate.

(2) The corresponding outline of coverage.

(3) Representative advertising materials to be used in this state.

(4) At the option of the insurer, any other documentation which the insurer believes will provide information sufficient to allow the commissioner to determine that the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 10231.6 have been met or which establishes that the insurance regulatory authority of another state has made a determination that the requirements have been met, or both.

(b) No group long-term care insurance coverage may be offered or sold to a resident of this
 state under a group policy issued in another state to a group described in subdivision (c) of Section 10231.6, unless, prior to advertising, marketing, or offering that coverage within this state, the association or associations, or the insurer of the association or associations, files evidence with the commissioner that the association or associations have at the outset a minimum of 100 persons, have been organized and maintained in good faith for a primary purpose other than that of obtaining insurance, have been in active existence for at least one year, have a constitution and bylaws which provide all of the following, and provide evidence that the following have been consistently implemented:

(1) The association or associations hold regular meetings, not less than annually, to further purposes of the members.

(2) Except for credit unions, the association or associations
 collect dues or solicit contributions from members.

(3) The members have voting privileges and representation on the governing board and committees.

Thirty days after that filing, the association or associations shall be deemed to satisfy those organizational requirements, unless the commissioner makes the finding that the association or associations do not satisfy those organizational requirements.

The association or associations, or the insurer of the association or associations, shall accompany this organizational filing with an informational filing which consists of the following materials:

(1) A specimen master policy and certificate.

(2) The corresponding outline of coverage.

(3) Representative advertising materials to be used in this state.

(c) Compliance with the informational filings required to be made by this section shall also constitute compliance with the filing requirements of Section 10233.9.

(d) The materials required to be filed with the commissioner by this section shall be filed with the commissioner for informational purposes only, and not for approval purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.1.

(a) Every policy that is intended to be a qualified long-term care insurance contract as provided by Public Law 104-191 shall be identified as such by prominently displaying and printing on page one of the policy form and the outline of coverage and in the application the following words: “This contract for long-term care insurance is intended to be a federally qualified long-term care insurance contract and may qualify you for federal and state tax benefits.” Every policy that is not intended to be a qualified long-term care insurance contract as provided by Public Law 104-191 shall be identified as such by prominently displaying and printing on page one of the policy form and the outline of coverage and in the application the following words:
 “This contract for long-term care insurance is not intended to be a federally
 qualified long-term care insurance contract.”

(b) Any policy or certificate in which benefits are limited to the provision of institutional care shall be called a “nursing facility and residential care facility only” policy or certificate and the words “Nursing Facility and Residential Care Facility Only” shall be prominently displayed on page one of the form and the outline of coverage. The commissioner may approve alternative wording if it is more descriptive of the benefits.

(c) Any policy or certificate in which benefits are limited to the provision of home care services, including community-based services, shall be called a “home care only” policy or certificate and the words “Home Care Only” shall be prominently displayed on page one of the form and the outline of
 coverage. The commissioner may approve alternative wording if it is more descriptive of the benefits.

(d) Any policy, certificate, or rider in which benefits are limited to the provision of all care settings, except nursing facility care, and that is offered under the California Partnership for Long-Term Care Program established by Section 22000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be called a home care, community-based services, and residential care facility only policy, certificate, or rider and the words “Home Care, Community-Based Services, and Residential Care Facility Only” shall be prominently displayed on the first page of the form and the outline of coverage. The commissioner may approve an alternative version of those words if the alternative version is more descriptive of the benefits provided. 

(e) Only those policies or certificates providing benefits for both institutional care and home care may be called “comprehensive long-term care” insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 565, Sec. 1.   (SB 1248)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.2.

(a) Every insurer that offers policies or certificates that are intended to be federally qualified long-term care insurance contracts, including riders to life insurance policies providing long-term care coverage, shall fairly and affirmatively concurrently file, offer, and market long-term care insurance policies or certificates not intended to be federally qualified, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10232.1.

(b) All long-term care insurance contracts, including
 riders to life insurance contracts providing long-term care coverage, approved after the effective date of this section shall meet all of the requirements of this chapter.

(c) Until October 1, 2001, or 90 days after approval of contracts submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (b), whichever comes first, insurers may continue to offer and market previously approved long-term care insurance contracts.

(d) Group policies issued prior to January 1, 1997, shall be allowed to remain in force and not be required to meet the requirements of this chapter, as amended during the 1997 portion of the 1997–98 Regular Session, unless those policies cease to be treated as federally qualified long-term care insurance contracts. If a policy or certificate issued on a group policy of that type ceases to be a federally qualified long-term care insurance contract under the grandfather rules
 issued by the United States Department of the Treasury pursuant to Section 7702B(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, the insurer shall offer the policy and certificate holders the option to convert, on a guaranteed-issue basis, to a policy or certificate that is federally tax qualified if the insurer sells tax-qualified policies.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commissioner approve by July 1, 2001, all accurate and complete contracts submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (b). It is the further intent of the Legislature that insurers submit contracts for approval and resolve further outstanding issues pursuant to subdivision (b) in a timely manner in order for the commissioner to approve the contracts by July 1, 2001.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 51, Sec. 3.   Effective July 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.3.

(a) All applications for long-term care insurance except that which is guaranteed issue, shall contain clear, unambiguous, short, simple questions designed to ascertain the health condition of the applicant. Each health-related question shall contain only one health status inquiry and shall require only a “yes” or “no” answer, except that the application may include a request for the name of any prescribed medication and the name of a prescribing physician. If the application requests the name of any prescribed medication or prescribing physician, then any mistake or omission shall not be used as a basis for the denial of a claim or the rescission of a policy or certificate.

(b) The following warning shall be printed conspicuously and in close conjunction with the
 applicant’s signature block:

“Caution: If your answers on this application are misstated or untrue, the insurer may have the right to deny benefits or rescind your coverage.”

(c) Every application for long-term care insurance shall include a checklist that enumerates each of the specific documents that this chapter requires be given to the applicant at the time of solicitation. The documents and notices to be listed in the checklist include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) The outline of coverage pursuant to Section 10233.5.

(2) The HICAP notice pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 10234.93.

(3) The long-term care insurance shoppers guide pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 10234.93.

(4) The “Long-Term Care Insurance Personal Worksheet” pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10234.95.
